Washington statutes.
RCW 41.34.110

Reentry.

A member who separates from service and then reestablishes membership may restore contributions to the member account.

[ 1996 c 39 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1996 c 39: See note following RCW 41.32.010.